test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_rijdo_dict-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:

 Noun - rijdo: # ok RIJDO
    rijdo+N+Sg+Nom:  rijdo
    rijdo+N+Sg+Gen:  [riˊjdo, riijdo]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Acc:  [riˊjdo, riijdo]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Ill:  riijdon
    rijdo+N+Sg+Loc: [riijdost, rijdoost]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Com:  rijdoin
    rijdo+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊjdottáá
    rijdo+N+Ess:  rijdon
    rijdo+N+Par:  rijdod
    rijdo+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊjdoh
    rijdo+N+Pl+Gen:  [riˊjdoi, riijdoi]
    rijdo+N+Pl+Acc:  rijdoid
    rijdo+N+Pl+Ill:  rijdoid
    rijdo+N+Pl+Loc:  [riˊjdoin, riijdoin]
    rijdo+N+Pl+Com:  riˊjdoiguin
    rijdo+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊjdoittáá

 Noun - nijtto:
    nijtto+N+Sg+Nom:  nijtto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Gen:  niˊjto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Acc:  niˊjto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Ill:  niijton
    nijtto+N+Sg+Loc: [niijtost, nijttoost]
    nijtto+N+Sg+Com:  nijttoin
    nijtto+N+Sg+Abe:  niˊjtottáá
    nijtto+N+Ess:  nijtton
    nijtto+N+Ess:  nijttod
    nijtto+N+Pl+Nom:  niˊjtoh
    nijtto+N+Pl+Gen: [niijtoi, niˊjtoi]
    nijtto+N+Pl+Acc:  niijtoid
    nijtto+N+Pl+Ill:  nijttoid
    nijtto+N+Pl+Loc:  niijtoin
    nijtto+N+Pl+Com:  niˊjtoiguin
    nijtto+N+Pl+Abe:  niˊjtoittáá

  Noun - sijvo:
    sijvo+N+Sg+Nom:  sijvo
    sijvo+N+Sg+Gen: [siˊjvo, siijvo]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Acc: [siˊjvo, siijvo]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Ill:  siijvon
    sijvo+N+Sg+Loc: [siijvost, sijvoost]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Com:  sijvoin
    sijvo+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊjvottáá
    sijvo+N+Ess:  sijvon
    sijvo+N+Par:  sijvod
    sijvo+N+Pl+Nom: [siijvoh, siˊjvoh]
    sijvo+N+Pl+Gen: [siijvoi, siˊjvoi]
    sijvo+N+Pl+Acc:  siijvoid
    sijvo+N+Pl+Ill:  sijvoid
    sijvo+N+Pl+Loc:  siijvoin
    sijvo+N+Pl+Com:  siˊjvoiguin
    sijvo+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊjvoittáá
